District of Columbia statutes.
1-401

Delegate to the House of Representatives from the District of Columbia.

(a)

The people of the District of Columbia shall be represented in the House of Representatives by a Delegate, to be known as the “Delegate to the House of Representatives from the District of Columbia”, who shall be elected by the voters of the District of Columbia in accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 10 of this title. The Delegate shall have a seat in the House of Representatives, with the right of debate, but not of voting, shall have all the privileges granted a Representative by § 6 of Article I of the Constitution, and shall be subject to the same restrictions and regulations as are imposed by law or rules on Representatives. The Delegate shall be elected to serve during each Congress.

(b)

(1)

No individual may hold the Office of Delegate to the House of Representatives from the District of Columbia unless on the date of his election:

(A)

He is a qualified elector (as that term is defined in § 1-1001.02(2)) of the District of Columbia;

(B)

He is at least 25 years of age;

(C)

He holds no other paid public office; and

(D)

He has resided in the District of Columbia continuously since the beginning of the 3-year period ending on such date.

(2)

He shall forfeit his office upon failure to maintain the qualifications required by this subsection.

History

Sept. 22, 1970, 84 Stat. 848, Pub. L. 91-405, title II, § 202

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-401.
1973 Ed., § 1-291.